Maine, session 132, LD52.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4069 is enacted to read:
§4069. Department application for and administration of certain federal benefits
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Federal benefit" means a benefit administered by the United States Social Security
Administration under Title II of the United States Social Security Act or by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs.
B. "Special-needs trust" has the same meaning as in Title 18-B, section 1212,
subsection 1, paragraph D.
2. Determination of potential eligibility. The department shall review whether a
child in the custody of the department may be eligible for a federal benefit. If the
department determines the child may be eligible for a federal benefit, the department shall
apply for the federal benefit on behalf of the child. The department shall notify the child,
the child's attorney or guardian ad litem and the child's parents or legal guardians of the
application for the federal benefit.
3. Representative payee. The department shall determine the representative payee to
receive the federal benefit of a child under subsection 2 in accordance with federal
regulations regarding appointment of representative payees. If the department is serving
as the representative payee, the department:
A. May not use the child's federal benefit to pay for or reimburse the department or
the State for any of the costs of the child's care;
B. May use the child's federal benefit for the child's unmet needs beyond what the
department is required to pay;
C. If appropriate, shall establish a special-needs trust to use and conserve the child's
federal benefit in a manner that is consistent with federal and state requirements for
special-needs trusts and in a manner that avoids federal and state asset and resource
limits;
Page 1 - 132LR0109(01)

D. Shall provide an annual accounting of the child's federal benefit to the child, the
child's attorney or guardian ad litem and the child's parents or legal guardians; and
E. Shall periodically provide the child with financial literacy training and support,
including information regarding the availability and use of funds conserved for the
child in accordance with this section. The training must begin before the child attains
14 years of age or, if the child is not in the custody of the department before the child
attains 14 years of age, as soon as practicable.
4. Training. The department shall provide financial training to department staff who
implement this section and to all representative payees under subsection 3. The training
must include information regarding fiduciary obligations of representative payees, ways to
preserve federal benefit eligibility, ways to plan and budget for unmet current needs and
foreseeable future needs of the child receiving the federal benefit and ways to ensure
required accounting of the child's federal benefit is submitted to the United States Social
Security Administration and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
5. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.